Missouri, session 2026, SB1332.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 41.480, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 41.037
and 41.480, to read as follows:
41.037. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Active duty combat", performing one of the
following services:
(a) Participation in an armed conflict;
(b) Performance of a hazardous service related to an
armed conflict in a foreign state; or
(c) Performance of a duty through an instrumentality
of war;
(2) "Official declaration of war", an official
declaration of war pursuant to an act of Congress as
authorized by Article I, Section 8, Clause 11 of the
Constitution of the United States.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, the Missouri National Guard and the members
thereof shall not be called forth into active duty combat by
the governor unless the United States Congress has:

SB 1332 2
(1) Made an official declaration of war; or
(2) Called forth the Missouri National Guard and the
members thereof in an official action taken pursuant to
Article I, Section 8, Clause 15 of the Constitution of the
United States for the purposes of expressly executing the
laws of the United States, repelling invasion, or
suppressing an insurrection.
3. The governor shall take all necessary actions to
comply with the requirements of subsection 2 of this section.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prohibit or limit the governor's authority to deploy the
Missouri National Guard into active duty for the purposes of
defense support for civil authority missions in a foreign
state or elsewhere within the United States.
41.480. 1. Except as provided in section 41.039, the
governor may, when in his opinion the circumstances so
warrant, call out the organized militia or any portion or
individual thereof to execute the laws, suppress actual and
prevent threatened insurrection and repel invasion. The
governor, if in his judgment the maintenance of law and
order will thereby be promoted, may by proclamation declare
martial law throughout the state or any part thereof.
2. The governor may, when in his opinion circumstances
so warrant, call out the organized militia or any portion
thereof as he deems necessary to provide emergency relief to
a distressed area in the event of earthquake, flood, tornado
or other actual or threatened public catastrophe creating
conditions of distress or hazard to public health and safety
beyond the capacities of local or other established agencies.
✓